tests/lin.twoc
Alphabet

 %[%+sg%]:0 %[%+pl%]:0 %[%+abs%]:0 %[%+def%]:0 %[%+inst%]:0 %[%+p1%]:0 %[%+p2%]:0 %[%+p3%]:0 %[%+aa%]:0 %[%+nn%]:0 %[%+fut%]:0 %[%+ref%]:0 %[%+inf%]:0 %[%+imp%]:0 %[%+cl1%]:0 %[%+cl5%]:0 %[%+cl6%]:0 %[%+cl7%]:0 %[%+cl8%]:0

 %[%-sg%]:0 %[%-pl%]:0 %[%-abs%]:0 %[%-def%]:0 %[%-inst%]:0 %[%-p1%]:0 %[%-p2%]:0 %[%-p3%]:0 %[%-aa%]:0 %[%-nn%]:0 %[%-fut%]:0 %[%-ref%]:0 %[%-inf%]:0 %[%-imp%]:0 %[%-cl1%]:0 %[%-cl5%]:0 %[%-cl6%]:0 %[%-cl7%]:0 %[%-cl8%]:0


;

Rules

"Match prefix"
Sx:0 /<= _ ;
   except
       _ (:*) Sy:0 ;
   where Sx in ( %[%-sg%] %[%-pl%] %[%-abs%] %[%-def%] %[%-inst%] %[%-p1%] %[%-p2%] %[%-p3%] %[%-aa%] %[%-nn%] %[%-fut%] %[%-ref%] %[%-inf%] %[%-imp%] %[%-cl1%] %[%-cl5%] %[%-cl6%] %[%-cl7%]  %[%-cl8%])
         Sy in ( %[%+sg%] %[%+pl%] %[%+abs%] %[%+def%] %[%+inst%] %[%+p1%] %[%+p2%] %[%+p3%] %[%+aa%] %[%+nn%] %[%+fut%] %[%+ref%] %[%+inf%] %[%+imp%] %[%+cl1%] %[%+cl5%] %[%+cl6%] %[%+cl7%]  %[%+cl8%])
   matched ;

"Inverse of Match prefix for use with mismatched tags"
Sx:0 /<= _ ;
   except
       Sy:0 :* _ ;
   where Sy in ( %[%-abs%] %[%-def%] %[%-inst%] %[%-fut%] %[%-ref%] %[%-sg%] %[%-pl%])
         Sx in ( %[%+abs%] %[%+def%] %[%+inst%] %[%+fut%] %[%+ref%] %[%+sg%] %[%+pl%])
matched ;



!Sets
!
!Features = %[%+sg%] %[%+pl%] %[%+abs%] %[%+def%] %[%+inst%] %[%+p1%] %[%+p2%] %[%+p3%] %[%+aa%] %[%+nn%];
!
!Rules
!
!"Match prefixes with agreement tags"
!Fx:0 <=> _ :* Fx:0 ;
!         Fx:0 :* _ ;
!     where Fx in Features ;
